pazar.laz.twol
Alphabet

	a b c ç d e f g ğ h i j k l m n o p r s ş t u v y z x ǩ ť ṕ ḉ ʒ ǯ ž 
	A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H İ J K L M N O P R S Ş T U V Y Z X Ǩ Ť Ṕ Ḉ Ʒ Ǯ Ž 

%{R%}:r %{R%}:0

%{G%}:g %{G%}:k %{G%}:ǩ

%{B%}:v %{B%}:b %{B%}:p %{B%}:ṕ %{B%}:m %{B%}:0		! Assimilation of person prefix based on the laryngel properties of the first sound in stem

%{I%}:i %{I%}:y

%{I2%}:e %{I2%}:i 



%{O%}:o %{O%}:v %{O%}:0

%{O2.2%}:o %{O2.2%}:v

%{O2.1%}:o %{O2.1%}:0

%{O2.3%}:o %{O2.3%}:0

%{O2.4%}:0 %{O2.4%}:o

%{O3.1%}:o %{O3.1%}:0 %{O3.1%}:e 

%{O3.2%}:o %{O3.2%}:0 %{O3.2%}:v

%{O4%}:o %{O4%}:e %{O4%}:v %{O4%}:0

%{O5%}:o %{O5%}:e %{O5%}:v %{O5%}:0

%{A%}:a %{A%}:e %{A%}:0

%{A5%}:a %{A5%}:e %{A5%}:0 %{A5%}:o %{A5%}:v

%{A4%}:a %{A4%}:0 %{A4%}:o %{A4%}:v

%{A3%}:a %{A3%}:0 %{A3%}:o

%{A3.2%}:a %{A3.2%}:e %{A3.2%}:0

%{E%}:e %{E%}:0

%{M%}:m %{M%}:n

%{N%}:n %{N%}:0


%{S%}:s %{S%}:n

%{Y%}:y %{Y%}:0

%{V%}:v %{V%}:0

%{R1%}:r %{R1%}:0

%{E1%}:e %{E1%}:0

%{E2%}:e %{E2%}:0



%{SS%}:s %{SS%}:0
;

Sets

Vowel = a o u e i;
VoicedC = b d g z j ğ v c m; 
Voiceless = p t k ç f s ş x; 
Ejectives = ǩ ť ṕ ḉ ǯ ž;
Nasals = m n;

Rules 

"Deletion of archiphoneme {R} appearing in thematic suffixes before archiphoneme {S}"
%{R%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{S%}: ;

"Deletion of archiphoneme {V} appearing in stem-finally when followed by a suffix starting with [u] sound"
%{V%}:0 <=> _ %>: u ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {B} as person prefix before vowel"
%{B%}:v <=> _ %>: [ Vowel: | %{I%}: ] ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {B} as person prefix before voiced consonants except [b] sound"
%{B%}:b <=> _ %>: VoicedC: ;
	except _ %>: b ;

"Deletion of archiphoneme {B} as person prefix because of a possible two consequent labiovelar combination"
%{B%}:0 <=> _ %>: b ;

!"Assimilate person prefix to p- before voiceless sounds"
!%{B%}:p <=> _ %>: [ Voiceless: | x ] ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {B} as person prefix to before ejectives"
%{B%}:ṕ <=> _ %>: Ejectives: ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {B} as person prefix before stem initial [n] sound"		! (ṕ- is also possible: ask!!!)
 %{B%}:m <=> _ %>: %{N%}:;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {G} as person prefix before voiced sounds"
%{G%}:g <=> _ %>: [VoicedC: | Vowel: | %{N%}: |%{I%}:] ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {G} as person prefix before voiceless sounds"
%{G%}:k <=> _ %>: Voiceless: ;

"Assimilation of laryngeal properties of archiphoneme {G} as person prefix before ejectives"
%{G%}:ǩ <=> _ %>: Ejectives: ;

"Stem-final vowel -i turns into -e when followed by plural suffix -pe"
%{I2%}:e <=> _ %>: pe ;

"Valency-related vowel i- turns into y- after o-" ! oftern turns into???
%{I%}:y <=> o %>: _ ;

"Delete final vowel a-"
%{A%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];
	
"Delete 3rd person plural a  "
%{A%}:0 <=>  Vowel: [ %{R%}:0 | %>: ] %>: _ n ;		

"Change final vowel a- to e-"
%{A%}:e <=> _ %>: [v|m] %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];


"Deletion of initial nasal before person prefix"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{B%}: %>: _ ḉ ;

"Delete r for supleteion"
%{R1%}:0 <=> _ %{E1%}: %>: %{S%}: ;

"Delete final vowel a-"
%{E1%}:0 <=> _ %>: [%{S%}: | ť ] ;


"Delete final vowel o-"
%{O%}:0 <=> _ %>: [Vowel: | %{I%}: ];
	except d _ %>: [e|a|o];
	
	
"Delete final vowel o- before a vowel"
%{O2.3%}:0 <=> _ %>: [Vowel: |%{I%}:];

"Change final vowel o- to v-"
%{O%}:v <=> d _ %>: a;

"Change final vowel o- to e-"
%{O%}:e <=> _ %>: [v|m] %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];


!"Delete thematic suffix -ur's consonant -r"
!%{R%}:0 <=> _ %>: [n|t|ť];

"Delete initial vowel -e in future tense"
%{E%}:0 <=> _ %>: [Vowel: | %{I%}:];

"Change final vowel o- to e-"
%{M%}:n <=> _ %{E%}:0 %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Delete initial vowel -e in future tense"
%{E2%}:0 <=> Vowel: %>:  _ ;



"Change non-past 3rd person suffix"
%{S%}:n <=> [%{R%}: |%{E1%}: ] %>: _  ;

"Question marker before 'u"
%{Y%}:u <=> u %>: _  ;

"Delete final vowel a- for preverbs"
%{A4%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Vowel -v alternation in preverbs-1"
%{A4%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Vowel -v alternation in preverbs"
%{A4%}:o <=> _ %>: [lva|ğ|yon];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs"
%{A3%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs=="
%{A3.2%}:0 <=> _ %>: Vowel: ;

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs=="
%{A3.2%}:0 <=> _ %>: [m|%{G%}: | %{B%}:] ;

"Combination with valency and person markers"
%{A3%}:o <=> _ %>: [%{G%}:g|%{B%}:v|m];

"Combination with valency and person markers-3"
%{A5%}:e <=> _ %>: [%{G%}:g|%{B%}:v|m];

"Combination with valency and person markers-2"
%{A5%}:o <=> _ %>: [lva|ğ|yon];

"Vowel -v alternation in preverbs-4"
%{A5%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-22"
%{A5%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-3"
%{O3.1%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Combination with valency and person markers-4"
%{O3.1%}:e <=> _ %>: [%{G%}:g|%{B%}:v|m];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-323"
%{O3.2%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:|%{E%}:];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-323"
%{O3.2%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Combination with valency and person markers-435"
%{O3.2%}:e <=> _ %>: [%{G%}:g|%{B%}:v|m];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-4"
%{O2.1%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o|%{I%}:];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-4"
%{O2.2%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-4556"
%{O2.4%}:0 <=> _ %>: [%{I%}: | Vowel:];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-5"
%{O4%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o| %{I%}: ];

"Combination with valency and person markers-5gfdc"
%{O4%}:e <=> _ %>: [ %{G%}:g |%{B%}:v |m] ;

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-5"
%{O4%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-56"
%{O5%}:0 <=> _ %>: [i|u|o| %{I%}: ];

"Combination with valency and person markers-5"
%{O5%}:e <=> _ %>: [ %{G%}:g |%{B%}:v ] ;

"Final vowel deletion in preverbs-5hgfj"
%{O5%}:v <=> _ %>: [a|%{A%}:a];

"Delete final -s"
%{SS%}:0 <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
